Tennessee, session 114, SB0009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-204, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (e)(2)(B), (f)(6), (f)(7)(B), (f)(7)(C), (f)(7)(E), (f)(7)(H), (g)(4)(B)(ii)(b), (g)(6),
(g)(7)(B), (g)(7)(C), (g)(7)(E), (g)(7)(G), and (j)(3), and subsection (l).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-204(d), is amended by deleting
the language "; provided, for the purposes of this subsection (d), "physician" does not include an
anesthesiologist, an emergency department physician, a pathologist or a radiologist".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-204(f)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "other than radiologists, anesthesiologists, pathologists, or emergency
physicians,".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-204(f)(4)(B)(ii), is amended by
deleting the language:
Provided, that with respect to any such domestic nonprofit public benefit corporation,
physician employees of any such faculty practice plan who practice in the specialties of
radiology, pathology, anesthesiology and/or emergency medicine shall be restricted to
practice as faculty practice plan employees in those health care institutions, including but
not limited to hospitals or surgery centers, in which they were practicing as employees of
the nonprofit public benefit corporation on May 30, 1997.
SB0009
000597
- 1 -

SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-204(g)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "other than radiologists, anesthesiologists, pathologists or emergency
physicians".
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-204(h)(5)(A), is amended by
deleting the language "specialties of ophthalmology, pathology, anesthesiology and/or
emergency medicine" and substituting "specialty of ophthalmology".
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-6-204, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
( ) This section does not require a particular employment relationship for the
employment of a radiologist, anesthesiologist, pathologist, or emergency physician, as
long as the employment of such physician otherwise complies with this chapter. As
used in this subsection ( ), "employment relationship" includes employment by direct
means and employment through an agreement with a third party.
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-9-104(f)(3), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-205, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (b)(6), (b)(9), (c)(6), (e)(2), (e)(3), (e)(6), (e)(8), and (e)(9), and subsection (g).
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-205(b)(1), is amended by
deleting the language ", other than radiologists, anesthesiologists, pathologists, or emergency
physicians,".
SECTION 11. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-205(c)(1), is amended by
deleting the language ", other than radiologists, anesthesiologists, pathologists or emergency
physicians".
SECTION 12. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-11-205, is amended by adding
the following as a new subsection:
- 2 - 000597

( ) This section does not require a particular employment relationship for the
employment of a radiologist, anesthesiologist, pathologist, or emergency physician by a
hospital licensed under this chapter or an affiliate of a hospital, as long as the
employment of such physician otherwise complies with this part. As used in this
subsection ( ), "employment relationship" includes employment by direct means and
employment through an agreement with a third party.
SECTION 13. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 000597